Utah statutes.
26-19-9.   Employee benefit plans.

As allowed pursuant to 29 U.S.C. Section 1144, an employee benefit plan may not include any provision that has the effect of limiting or excluding coverage or payment for any health care for an individual who would otherwise be covered or entitled to benefits or services under the terms of the employee benefit plan based on the fact that the individual is eligible for or is provided services under the state plan.

